Utah statutes.
72-3-201.   Jurisdiction over highways leading to and within state parks.

(1)  As used in this part, "state park access highways" means the highways specified under this part.

(2)  The department, a county, or a municipality has jurisdiction over and responsibility for:

(a)  primary access highways to state parks;

(b)  highways to the main attraction within each state park; and

(c)  highways through state parks providing access to land uses beyond state park boundaries.

(3) (a)  The appropriate entities with jurisdiction over and responsibility for the highways referred to in Subsections (2)(a) and (b) are specified in Sections 72-3-202 through 72-3-206.

(b)  Jurisdiction over and responsibility for highways under Subsection (2)(c) shall be determined by the commission as described in Sections 72-3-102, 72-3-103, and 72-3-104.

